Tennessee, session 114, HB2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 47, Chapter 18, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
47-18-139.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Ancillary hotel services" or "services" means supplementary,
nonroom products and offerings by a hotel, including parking, breakfast or other
food or dining services, spa treatments, and early check-ins or late check-outs;
(2) "Hotel" means any structure, or any portion of any structure, that is
occupied or intended or designed for occupancy by transients for dwelling,
lodging or sleeping purposes, and includes any hotel, inn, tourist court, tourist
camp, tourist cabin, motel, short-term rental unit, or any place in which rooms,
lodgings, or accommodations are furnished to transients for a consideration;
(3) "Occupancy" means the use or possession, or the right to the use or
possession, of any room, lodgings, or accommodations in a hotel for a period of
less than thirty (30) continuous days; and
(4) "Third-party booking site":
(A) Means a website or mobile application that allows a consumer
to compare prices and booking options for multiple hotels located in this
state;
HB2180
011354
- 1 -

(B) Includes a website that aggregates information from multiple
websites into one (1) website and online travel agencies; and
(C) Does not include a hotel's website that only provides
information about bookings and services for the hotel.
(b) If a third-party booking site includes information about ancillary hotel services
available at a hotel and access to the services requires payment of additional fees by the
consumer beyond the cost of the room, then the third-party booking site must disclose:
(1) That there are additional fees required to access such services; and
(2) Which services require such additional fees.
(c) A violation of this section constitutes a violation of the Tennessee Consumer
Protection Act of 1977, compiled in this part. A violation of this section constitutes an
unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting trade or commerce and is subject to the
penalties and remedies as provided in the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18,104(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Failing to disclose additional fees required to access ancillary hotel services
at a hotel listed by a third-party booking site, in violation of § 47-18-139;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 011354